Hawaii statutes.
§577-23 Parent et al. responsibility,
penalty. Any parent, guardian, or other person having the care, custody,
or control of an unmarried minor, who knowingly permits such minor to violate
section 577-22, shall be fined not more than $50 or imprisoned not more than
thirty days. [L 1927, c 224, pt of §1; RL 1935, §4536; RL 1945, §12288; RL
1955, §330-20; HRS §577-23; am L 1975, c 77, §1(8)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next